Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1705
Collection of taxes; tax receipt; form; required information.

The tax receipt shall be substantially in the following form, with such additions and amendments thereto as may be necessary to make it conform to law:

$...... Treasurer's Office ......... County, Nebraska ........ 20....

Received of ...........................................

In full or in part the taxes for the year 20.... on the following described property:

....................................................................

................... Deputy ................. Treasurer.

If the tax is paid upon real property or personal property, the receipt shall describe the same as described in the tax list and give the valuation thereof.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 148, p. 441;

R.S.1913, § 6477;

C.S.1922, § 6000;

Laws 1929, c. 167, § 1, p. 576;

C.S.1929, § 77-1905;

R.S.1943, § 77-1705;

Laws 1957, c. 334, § 3, p. 1170;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 164;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 63.